Delaware, session 153, HB96.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF DELAWARE: Section 1. Amend Â§ 2553, Title 29 of the Delaware Code by making deletions as shown by strike through and insertions as shown by underline as follows: Â§ 2553. Division of Civil Rights and Public Trust; powers and duties. (a) The Division of Civil Rights and Public Trust shall do all of the following: (5) Provide a quarterly report to the Chief Clerk of the House of Representatives for distribution to all members, the Secretary of the Senate for distribution to all members, the Governor, and the Director and Librarian of the Office of Legislative Services, detailing any request from a federal agency, federal entity, or entity holding itself out as a federal agency or entity, for assistance from any State law enforcement agency related to any of the following: a. Information about the issuance of any driving privilege card from the Department of Transportation or Division of Motor Vehicles. b. Continuation or discontinuation of the Department of Educationâs migrant education program and ensuring funding is set aside by the state in the event federal funding for migrant education is terminated. c. Stopping any individual based purely on suspicion of undocumented status. d. Assisting any federal immigration or law enforcement agency from any activity or operation in any school or church. e. School Resource Officer or constable assistance or participation in any federal law enforcement activity related to immigration. f. Dissemination of information about an undocumented student from the Department of Education and any Delaware school district. g. Release of information about an undocumented resident from the Department of Finance or Division of Revenue.